District of Columbia statutes.
26-1026

Multiple licenses.

Any person licensed under this chapter shall not be required to obtain a separate license to engage in cashing of checks in the District of Columbia under Chapter 3 of this title.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 27, 47 DCR 3431

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 13 of D.C. Law 12-210 and § 201 of D.C. Law 13-57 ( 46 DCR 8894) each added sections designated as §§ 26-1301 to 26-1306 1981 Ed., relating to data match requirements for financial institutions. Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 12-210 and § 401(b) of D.C. Law 13-57 each provide that their respective act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 12-210 and § 401(b) of D.C. Law 13-57 each provide that their respective act shall expire after 225 days of having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of a new Chapter 13 of Title 26, comprised of §§ 26-1301 through 26-1306 1981 Ed., see § 12(a)-(f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 12(a)-(f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, February 2, 1999, 45 DCR 8495), and § 12(a)-(f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 26-1301 to 26-1306 1981 Ed., see § 201(a) to (f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 26-1301 to 26-1306 1981 Ed., see § 201(a) to (f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 26-1301 to 26-1306 1981 Ed., see § 201(a) to (f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).